Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-127 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
“Administrative Report Consolidation Act”.
B. There is hereby created the Administrative Report
Consolidation Board to evaluate administrative reporting
requirements for public school districts and technology center
school districts in this state to eliminate duplicative or outdated
reporting requirements, consolidate reports where necessary, make
legislative recommendations regarding statutory reporting
requirements, and create an action plan for continual review of
reporting requirements. The Board shall consist of:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1236 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Four members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate from a list submitted by members of the Senate consisting of:
a. two school district superintendents who have been
employed as superintendents for at least five (5)
years and who are employed by school districts located
in counties with a population of four hundred thousand
(400,000) persons or more according to the last
preceding Federal Decennial Census,
b. a school district superintendent who has been employed
as a superintendent for at least five (5) years and
who is employed by a school district located in a
county with a population of two hundred fifty thousand
(250,000) persons or more but fewer than four hundred
thousand (400,000) persons according to the last
preceding Federal Decennial Census, and
c. a technology center school district superintendent who
has been employed as a superintendent for at least
five (5) years and who is employed by a technology
center school district located in a county with a
population of four hundred thousand (400,000) persons
or more according to the last preceding Federal
Decennial Census;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1236 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Four members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives from a list submitted by members of the House of
Representatives consisting of:
a. two school district superintendents who have been
employed as superintendents for at least five (5)
years and who are employed by school districts located
in counties with a population of four hundred thousand
(400,000) persons or more according to the last
preceding Federal Decennial Census,
b. a school district superintendent who has been employed
as a superintendent for at least five (5) years and
who is employed by a school district located in a
county with a population of two hundred fifty thousand
(250,000) persons or more but fewer than four hundred
thousand (400,000) persons according to the last
preceding Federal Decennial Census, and
c. a technology center school district superintendent who
has been employed as a superintendent for at least
five (5) years and who is employed by a technology
center school district located in a county with a
population of fewer than four hundred thousand
(400,000) persons according to the last preceding
Federal Decennial Census; and
3. Three members appointed by the Governor consisting of:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1236 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. a school district superintendent who has been employed
as a superintendent for at least five (5) years and
who is employed by a school district located in a
county with a population of two hundred fifty thousand
(250,000) persons or more but fewer than four hundred
thousand (400,000) persons according to the last
preceding Federal Decennial Census, and
b. two school district superintendents who have been
employed as superintendents for at least five (5)
years and who are employed by school districts located
in counties with a population of fewer than two
hundred fifty thousand (250,000) persons according to
the last preceding Federal Decennial Census.
C. Initial appointments to the Administrative Report
Consolidation Board shall be made within thirty (30) days after the
effective date of this act. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate
and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each appoint
one member for one (1) year, one member for two (2) years, and two
members for three (3) years. The Governor shall appoint one member
for one (1) year, one member for two (2) years, and one member for
three (3) years. Members shall serve until their successors are
duly appointed for a term of three (3) years. Vacancies shall be
filled by the appointing authority. The Board shall annually by
August 30 elect from its membership a chair and vice chair.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1236 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. The Board shall conduct an organizational meeting not later
than August 1, 2026. The Board shall meet at least annually, or as
often as may be required to perform the duties imposed upon it.
Board members may participate via videoconference if they are
visible and audible to each other through a video monitor.
E. A quorum of the Board shall be required to approve any final
action of the Board. For the purposes of this section, six members
shall constitute a quorum.
F. Members of the Board shall receive no compensation or travel
reimbursement.
G. The Board may contract with an independent entity to assist
in the evaluation and analysis of reporting requirements required by
subsection B of this section.
H. The State Department of Education and the Oklahoma
Department of Career and Technology Education shall provide staff
and administrative support for the Board.
I. The Board shall electronically submit a report of its
findings and recommendations by August 1, 2027, to the Governor, the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, the State Department of Education, and the Oklahoma
Department of Career and Technology Education. The report shall
include a recommendation to consolidate all required annual reports
to not more than ten (10) each for public school districts and
technology center school districts. The Board may electronically
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1236 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

subm it additional reports of its findings and recommendations by
August 1, 2028, and each August 1 thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
February 10, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED
















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1236 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)